Utah statutes.
53A-11-203.   Vision screening.
(1)  A child under seven years of age entering school for the first time in
this state must present the following to the school:
(a)  a certificate signed by a licensed physician, optometrist, or other
licensed health professional approved by the division, stating that the child
has received vision screening to determine the presence of amblyopia or other
visual defects.  As used in this section, "division" means the Division of
Services for the Blind and Visually Impaired, State Office of Education; or
(b)  a written statement signed by at least one parent or legal guardian of
the child that the screening violates the personal beliefs of the parent or
legal guardian.
(2)  The division shall provide vision screening report forms to persons
approved by the division to conduct the screening.
(3)  Each school district may conduct free vision screening clinics for
children aged 3-1/2 to seven.
(4)  The division shall maintain a central register of children, aged 3-1/2 to
seven, who fail vision screening and who are referred for follow-up treatment.
The register shall include the name of the child, age or birthdate, address,
cause for referral, and follow-up results.  Each school district shall report
referral follow-up results to the division.
(5)  The division shall coordinate and supervise the training of persons who
serve as vision screeners.
(6)  A licensed health professional providing vision care to private patients
may not participate as a screener in free vision screening programs provided
by school districts.
(7)  The Department of Health shall, by rule, set standards and procedures for
vision screening required by this chapter, and shall provide the division with
copies of rules, standards, instructions, and test charts necessary for
conducting vision screening.
(8)  The division shall supervise screening, referral, and follow-up required
by this chapter.
